District of Columbia statutes.
31-3302.03

Application of financial capacity limits.

(a)

A health insurer may deny health insurance coverage in the individual market to an eligible individual if the health insurer has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the Commissioner that:

(1)

It does not have the financial reserves necessary to underwrite additional coverage; and

(2)

It is applying this section uniformly to all individuals in the individual market in the District of Columbia consistent with the laws of the District of Columbia and without regard to any health status-related factor of such individuals and without regard to whether the individuals are eligible individuals.

(b)

A health insurer, upon denying individual health insurance coverage in the District of Columbia in accordance with subsection (a) of this section, may not offer such coverage in the individual market within the District of Columbia for a period of 180 days after the date such coverage is denied or until the health insurer has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the Commissioner that the health insurer has sufficient financial reserves to underwrite additional coverage, whichever is later.

History

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-209, § 203, 45 DCR 8433

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1024.

Temporary Addition of Section

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3301.01.

Emergency Legislation

See notes to § 31-3301.01.